Wyoming, session 2025, HB0282.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 34-1-142(d), (e) and by creating a
new subsection (j), 39-11-101(a)(vi), (xvii)(intro) by
creating a new subparagraph (C) and by renumbering
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
subparagraph (C) as (D), 39-11-102(c)(xv) and (d)(i),
39-11-102.1(c)(ii) and (iii), 39-11-109(b)(iv),
39-13-102(n), 39-13-103(b)(ii), (iii)(intro), by creating a
new subparagraph (C), by renumbering subparagraph (C) as
(D), (vi) through (viii) and by creating a new paragraph
(xviii) and 39-13-109(b)(i) are amended to read:

34-1-142. Instrument transferring title to real
property; procedure; exceptions; confidentiality.

(d) Except as provided in subsection (j) of this
section, the sworn statements shall be used by the county
assessors and the state board of equalization and the
department of revenue along with other statements filed
only as data in a collection of statistics which shall be
used collectively in determining sales-price ratios by
county. An individual statement shall not, by itself, be
used by the county assessor to adjust the assessed value of
any individual property.

(e) Except as provided in subsection (j) of this
section, the statement is not a public record and shall be
held confidential by the county clerk, county assessor,
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
county board of equalization, the state board of
equalization and the department of revenue. A statement may
be disclosed pursuant to W.S. 39-13-109(a)(i) to any person
wishing to review or contest his property tax assessment or
valuation. The statement shall not be subject to discovery
in any other county or state proceeding.

(j) Sworn statements regarding real property taxable
under W.S. 39-13-103(b)(iii)(C) shall be available to a
county assessor, a county board of equalization, the
department of revenue and the state board of equalization
for purposes of determining the value of property for
purposes of property taxation. Nothing in this subsection
shall waive the confidentiality requirements as specified
in subsection (e) of this section.

39-11-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act unless otherwise specifically
provided:

(vi) "Fair market value" means the amount in
cash, or terms reasonably equivalent to cash, a well
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
informed buyer is justified in paying for a property and a
well informed seller is justified in accepting, assuming
neither party to the transaction is acting under undue
compulsion, and assuming the property has been offered in
the open market for a reasonable time, except, fair market
value of agricultural land shall be determined as provided
by W.S. 39-13-103(b)(x), fair market value of residential
real property shall be determined as provided in W.S.
39-13-103(b)(xviii) and fair market value of mine products
shall be determined as provided by W.S. 39-14-103(b),
39-14-203(b), 39-14-303(b), 39-14-403(b), 39-14-503(b),
39-14-603(b) and 39-14-703(b);

(xvii) "Taxable value" means a percent of the
fair market value or other value required by law of
property in a particular class as follows:

(C) Residential real property, eight and
three tenths percent (8.3%), provided that the value of
residential real property shall be determined as provided
in W.S. 39-13-103(b)(xviii);

HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, including property valued and assessed under W.S.
39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix), nine and one-half percent
(9.5%).

39-11-102. Administration; confidentiality;
department of revenue.

(c) In addition to the other powers and duties
imposed by law, the department shall:

(xv) Prescribe the system of establishing the
fair market value or other value required by law of all
property valued for property taxation to ensure that all
property within a class is uniformly valued. The county
assessor and the facilities of his office, together with
the deputy assessors and clerical assistants in each
county, at the direction of the department, shall give full
aid in the installation of the prescribed system in the
county. The county shall also furnish the necessary
supplies and records for installing the system;

HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
(d) The following shall be adopted in accordance with
the requirements and procedures of the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act:

(i) Adoption of any manual, formula, method or
system to be used to determine the fair market value or
other value required by law of property for tax purposes;

39-11-102.1. Administration; state board of
equalization.

(c) The state board of equalization shall perform the
duties specified in article 15, section 10 of the Wyoming
constitution and shall hear appeals from county boards of
equalization and review final decisions of the department
upon application of any interested person adversely
affected, including boards of county commissioners for the
purposes of this subsection, under the contested case
procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.
Upon request of a county board of equalization providing
compelling reasons to do so, the state board of
equalization may accept a case certified directly to the
state board of equalization pursuant to rules adopted by
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
the state board of equalization. The state board of
equalization shall accept a case certified directly to the
state board of equalization that involves property that may
subject a county to tax liability as provided in W.S.
39-13-102(c)(iv). The board shall also review final
decisions of the department of transportation concerning
the assessment or application of taxes authorized under
this title upon application of any interested person
adversely affected. Any interested person adversely
affected by the adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule
pursuant to W.S. 16-3-103(a) shall be afforded an
opportunity for a hearing before the board. In addition,
the board shall:

(ii) Prescribe the form for the abstract of the
assessment roll, examine and compare the abstracts of the
counties and equalize the same, so that all taxable
property in the state is assessed at its fair market value,
and to that end shall add to or deduct from the aggregate
valuation of the property, or any class or classes of
property, in any county such percent as will bring the same
to its fair market value. When any assessed valuation is to
be increased or decreased, the board shall provide not less
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
than twenty (20) days notice of the proposed action to the
county board of equalization and county assessor of the
county in which the property is situated. If requested, the
state board of equalization shall provide an opportunity
for a hearing for the county board of equalization and
assessor of the affected county. The hearing shall be held
in the affected county. After a hearing, if requested, the
county board of equalization shall take the necessary
action to effectuate the action taken by the state board of
equalization. The state board of equalization shall certify
the valuation to be used for all tax levies on or before
the first Monday in August. The board shall communicate its
equalization actions to the department, along with any
recommendations for improved work practices of county
assessors. This paragraph shall not apply to residential
real property taxable under W.S. 39-13-103(b)(iii)(C);

(iii) When in the opinion of the board, it would
be of assistance in equalizing values under paragraph (ii)
of this subsection, the board may require any county
assessor to furnish statements showing assessments of the
property of any person within the county. The board shall
consider and equalize county assessments under paragraph
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
(ii) of this subsection and may increase or decrease
assessments returned by the county board of equalization
when the property so assessed appears to be over-valued or
under-valued, first giving notice to those persons
affected. The notice shall fix a time and place of hearing.
Any affected person may appeal from the decision of the
board to the district court of the county in which the
property is situated. This paragraph shall not apply to
residential real property taxable under W.S.
39-13-103(b)(iii)(C);

39-11-109. Taxpayer remedies.

(b) Appeals. The following shall apply:

(iv) In any appeal to the board authorized by
this section, the taxpayer may present any credible
evidence, including expert opinion testimony, to rebut the
presumption in favor of a valuation asserted by the
department. The rebuttable presumption in favor of a
valuation asserted by the department shall not apply to the
extent the rebuttable presumption conflicts with the
rebuttable presumption in W.S. 39-13-103(b)(xviii)(A)(III).
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
The board shall make specific findings and conclusions as
to the evidence presented.

39-13-102. Administration; confidentiality.

(n) Following determination of the fair market value
or other value required by law of property the department
shall notify the taxpayer by mail or, if offered by the
department and upon request of the taxpayer, by electronic
transmission of the assessed value. The person assessed may
file written objections to the assessment with the board
within thirty (30) days of the date of postmark or the date
of electronic transmission, whichever is earlier, and
appear before the board at a time specified by the board.
For purposes of this subsection, if a written objection is
mailed or sent by electronic transmission by the person
assessed, it shall be deemed timely filed if it is
postmarked or transmitted not later than thirty (30) days
after the mailing or electronic transmission of the
notification of the assessed value. The person assessed
shall also file a copy of the written objections with the
county treasurer of the county in which the property is
located, who shall notify the county assessor and the board
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
of county commissioners, with an estimate of the tax amount
under appeal based upon the previous year's tax levy.

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(ii) All taxable property shall be annually
valued at its fair market value or other value required by
law. Except as otherwise provided by law for specific
property, the department shall prescribe by rule and
regulation the appraisal methods and systems for
determining fair market value using generally accepted
appraisal standards;

(iii) Beginning January 1, 1989, "Taxable value"
means a percent of the fair market value or other value
required by law of property in a particular class as
follows:

(C) Residential real property, eight and
three tenths percent (8.3%), provided that the value of
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
residential real property shall be determined as provided
in paragraph (xviii) of this subsection;

(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, nine and one-half percent (9.5%).

(vi) Each deputy county assessor upon completing
the assessment of property within the district assigned to
him shall immediately deliver all books, records, schedules
and lists to the county assessor and make and subscribe the
following oath: "I, ...., deputy assessor in and for
district No. ...., county of ...., State of Wyoming, do
solemnly swear (or affirm), that I have obtained from every
person within the district, the lists and schedules
required by law, and have received the lists and schedules
according to law, from every person in the district; that I
have carefully examined each of the lists and schedules,
and have revised and corrected the lists when necessary;
that I have to the best of my knowledge and ability valued
the property in the lists and schedules at its fair market
value or other value as required by law; that in no case
have I knowingly omitted to perform any duty required of me
by law and have not, in any way, connived at any evasion or
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
violation of any of the requirements of law in relation to
the listing and valuation of property.";

(vii) The county assessor shall enter in books
furnished for that purpose, from the tax schedule, the
enumeration and fair market value or other value as
required by law of all taxable property assessed by him or
his deputies. The county assessor shall enter the names of
persons against whom property is assessed in the county
assessment roll in alphabetical order. On or before the
fourth Monday in April, or as soon thereafter as is
practicable, the county assessor shall send all assessment
schedules to taxpayers by mail at their last known address
or, if offered by the county and upon request of the
taxpayer, by electronic transmission, and return the county
assessment roll enumerating the property and value assessed
by him or his deputies to the board of county commissioners
together with a list stating the assessed value of taxable
property within each school district, municipality or
special district in the county;

(viii) Every assessment schedule sent to a
taxpayer shall contain the property's estimated fair market
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
value or other value required by law for the current and
previous year, or, productive value in the case of
agricultural property. The schedule shall also contain the
assessment ratio as provided by paragraph (b)(iii) of this
section for the taxable property, the amount of taxes
assessed on the taxable property from the previous year,
and an estimate of the taxes which will be due and payable
for the current year based on the previous year's mill
levies. The schedule shall contain a statement of the
process to contest assessments as prescribed by W.S.
39-13-109(b)(i);

(xviii) The following shall apply to the
valuation of residential real property, as made subject to
taxation in subparagraph (iii)(C) of this subsection:

(A) Beginning January 1, 2026, the fair
market value of residential real property shall be
determined as follows:

(I) For any residential real property
that was last acquired on or before December 31, 2019, the
base year value for the residential real property shall be
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
equal to the fair market value of the property on January
1, 2019;

(II) For any residential real property
that was last acquired on or after January 1, 2020 and on
or before December 31, 2025, the base year value for the
residential real property shall be equal to the fair market
value of the property on January 1 of the year the property
was last acquired;

(III) For any residential real
property that was acquired on or after January 1, 2026,
there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the
acquisition value of the property is the fair market value
of the property and the acquisition value shall be used as
the base year value for the property except as provided in
subdivision (IV) of this subparagraph;

(IV) Notwithstanding subdivision (III)
of this subparagraph, for any residential real property
that was acquired on or after January 1, 2026, the fair
market value of the property on January 1 of the year the
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
property was acquired shall be used as the base year value
of the property if:

(1) The presumption under
subdivision (III) of this subparagraph is rebutted by a
preponderance of the evidence showing that the acquisition
price paid to acquire the property was not fair market
value because a party to the transaction was acting under
undue influence or the terms of the transaction were not
negotiated at arms-length between an informed buyer and
seller; or

(2) The owner of the residential
real property does not submit information that is
sufficient to establish the acquisition value of the
residential real property under subdivision (III) of this
subparagraph. The department shall promulgate rules
regarding the documentation and procedures required to
establish acquisition value under this paragraph.

(B) The base year value determined under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be adjusted as
follows:
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305

(I) The base year value shall be
adjusted by an inflation factor that compounds annually
each year beginning in the first year after the base year
value is determined under subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph. The inflation factor shall be the lesser of two
percent (2%) or the rate of the consumer price index or its
successor index of the United States department of labor,
bureau of labor statistics, for the applicable year;

(II) The base year value shall be
adjusted as necessary to account for increases in the value
of the property caused by new construction or significant
additions to the residential real property. The value of
the new construction or significant additions shall be
added to the base year value of the residential real
property. The value of the new construction or significant
additions shall be determined by the construction costs.
The department shall adopt rules specifying how
construction costs are determined. Actual costs may be
submitted to determine construction costs. If actual costs
are not submitted or if the construction costs do not
represent fair value because a party to the transaction was
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
acting under undue influence or the terms of the
transaction were not negotiated at arms-length, the
construction costs shall be determined based on average
construction costs in the state for the applicable tax
year. The department shall adopt rules specifying how
significant additions to residential real property and
construction costs are reported. As used in this
subdivision, "significant addition" means any construction
of real property that adds habitable square feet to the
residential real property and includes construction where
all or a portion of the residential real property is
demolished and reconstructed. "Significant addition" shall
not include finishing an unfinished portion of the existing
residential real property.

(C) The amount determined pursuant to
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph shall be the
fair market value of the residential real property until
ownership of the property is transferred to a new person.
Each time residential real property is transferred to a new
person, the property shall be valued as provided in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph to determine the new
base year value of the property. The new base year value of
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
the property shall be subject to the inflation factor
provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph in
subsequent tax years;

(D) As used in this paragraph:

(I) "Acquisition value," as used in
this subparagraph, means the actual full amount paid or to
be paid to acquire residential real property;

(II) "Residential real property" means
real property improved by a dwelling designed to house not
more than four (4) families and includes a detached garage
owned by the owner of the dwelling and any associated
residential land up to thirty-five (35) acres where the
dwelling is located if the land is owned by the owner of
the dwelling. The dwelling may include any type of
residence including a single family home, an individual
condominium unit, a mobile home or a trailer if the
dwelling is used as a primary residence;

(III) "Transfer" or "acquisition" of
residential real property does not include:
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305

(1) A transfer of property
between spouses or between a parent and their child;

(2) A transfer of property
pursuant to a court order including to effectuate a
settlement agreement or in compliance with a decree of
divorce or judicial separation;

(3) A transfer of property to a
trust established for the benefit of the prior owner;

(4) A transfer of property to a
corporation, partnership or limited liability company if
the prior owner of the property is a shareholder or owner
of the corporation, partnership or limited liability
company;

(5) A donation of residential
real property to a religious or charitable organization
including a nonprofit organization;

HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
(6) Any other transfer of
property that the department determines by rule should not
be an acquisition of property due to the relationship of
the parties or other factors.

39-13-109. Taxpayer remedies.

(b) Appeals. The following shall apply:

(i) Any person wishing to contest an assessment
of his property shall file not later than thirty (30) days
after the date of the assessment schedule properly sent
pursuant to W.S. 39-13-103(b)(vii), a statement with the
county assessor specifying the reasons why the assessment
is incorrect. For purposes of this paragraph, if a
statement of reasons is mailed or sent by electronic
transmission by the person assessed, it shall be deemed
timely filed if it is postmarked or transmitted not later
than thirty (30) days after the mailing or the electronic
transmission of the notification of the assessment
schedule. The county assessor shall provide a copy to the
county clerk as clerk of the county board of equalization.
The county assessor and the person contesting the
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
assessment, or his agent, shall disclose witnesses and
exchange information, evidence and documents relevant to
the appeal, including sales information from relevant
statements of consideration if requested, no later than
thirty (30) days prior to the scheduled county board of
equalization hearing. The assessor shall specifically
identify the sales information used to determine market
value of the property under appeal. A county board of
equalization may receive evidence relative to any
assessment and may require the person assessed or his agent
or attorney to appear before it, be examined and produce
any documents relating to the assessment. The appeal may be
dismissed if any person willfully neglects or refuses to
attend a meeting of a county board of equalization and be
examined or answer any material question upon the board's
request. The state board of equalization shall adopt rules
to be followed by any county board of equalization when
conducting appeals under this subsection. All hearings
shall be conducted in accordance with the rules adopted by
the state board of equalization. Each hearing shall be
recorded electronically or by a court reporter or a
qualified stenographer or transcriptionist. The taxpayer
may present any evidence that is relevant, material or not
HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
repetitious, including expert opinion testimony, to rebut
the presumption in favor of a valuation asserted by the
county assessor or related to the presumption in W.S.
39-13-103(b)(xviii)(A)(III). The county attorney or his
designee may represent the county board or the assessor,
but not both. The assessor may be represented by an
attorney and the board may hire a hearing officer. All
deliberations of the board shall be in public. The county
board of equalization may affirm the assessor's valuation
or find in favor of the taxpayer and remand the case back
to the assessor. The board shall make specific written
findings and conclusions as to the evidence presented not
later than October 1 of each year;

Section 2. The state board of equalization and the
department of revenue shall promulgate all rules necessary
to implement this act not later than January 1, 2026.

HB0282

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0305
Section 3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective January 1,
2026.

(END)
HB0282